Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 2. Sick Leave and Family and Personal Leave.

§ 51.1-1104.
Sick leave benefit for participating employees.

On the effective date of coverage for existing employees, and thereafter on each January 10, existing participating full-time employees shall receive an amount of sick leave based on the employee’s number of months of state service as an eligible employee, as follows:

Click to view

Participating full-time employees, except for those described in subsection A, shall receive an initial amount of sick leave at the time their employment or reemployment commences, as follows:

Click to viewThereafter, on each January 10 such employees shall receive an amount of sick leave as provided in subsection A.

On the effective date of coverage for existing qualifying part-time employees, and thereafter on each January 10, existing participating qualifying part-time employees shall receive an amount of sick leave based on the employee’s number of months of state service as an eligible employee, as follows:

Click to view

Participating qualifying part-time employees, except for those described in subsection C, shall receive an initial amount of sick leave at the time their employment or reemployment commences, as follows:

Click to viewThereafter, on each January 10 such employees shall receive an amount of sick leave as provided in subsection C.

Any partial calendar month during which a participating employee was employed shall constitute one month of state service for purposes of this section.

Participating employees shall not be paid or otherwise compensated upon leaving employment for any balance of unused sick leave provided to them under this section.

Unused balances of sick leave granted under this section shall not be carried forward beyond the calendar year in which such leave is granted.

Employees receiving disability benefits on January 10 of any year shall be granted sick leave for such year on the date they return to active employment. The amount of sick leave granted for such year shall be determined as if they were continuing employment on the date of their return to work as provided in subsections A through D.

Months of state service
Number of hours
Less than 60
64
60 to 119
72
120 or more
80

Date employment commenced
Number of hours
January 10 through July 9
64
July 10 through January 9
40

Months of state service
Number of hours
Less than 120
32
120 or more
40

Date employment commenced
Number of hours
January 10 through July 9
32
July 10 through January 9
20

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, c. 889.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsections A, C, E, and H, substituted “January 10” for “January 1”; in subsections A, C, and E, substituted “of state service” for “of service”; and in subsections B and D, substituted “July 9” for “June 30,” and substituted “July 10 through January 9” for “July 1 through December 31.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889 substituted “coverage for existing employees” for “participation in the program” in subsections A and C; in subsection B, substituted “except for those described in subsection A” for “commencing employment or who are reemployed on or after January 1, 1999” and “at the time” for “for the calendar year during which”; in both subsections C and D, inserted “initial” and “or reemployment,” deleted “based on their first date of employment” and under “Date employment commenced,” substituted “10” for “1,” and added the last paragraph; in subsection D, substituted “except for those described in subsection C” for “commencing employment or who are reemployed on or after January 1, 1999,” and “at the time” for “for the calendar year during which”; and deleted “prior to January 10, 1999” following “employee was employed” in subsection E.

§ 51.1-1105.
Use of sick leave by participating employees.

Participating employees shall be eligible to take sick leave to account for absences due to an incident, illness, or injury for periods when disability benefits are not payable. Participating employees shall be compensated by their employers at 100 percent of creditable compensation for each hour of sick leave taken, not to exceed the employee’s sick leave balance.

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, c. 889.

The 1999 amendment

substituted “for periods when disability benefits are not payable” for “in accordance with case management guidelines approved by the Board” in the first sentence.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889 substituted “an” for “a short term” in the first sentence.

§ 51.1-1106.
Sick leave benefit for nonparticipating employees.

Eligible employees subject to personnel policies of the Department of Human Resource Management who elect not to participate in the program shall receive sick leave benefits in accordance with policies of the Department of Human Resource Management. Eligible employees not subject to personnel policies of the Department of Human Resource Management who elect not to participate in the program shall receive sick leave benefits in accordance with policies of their appointing authority.

History.

1998, c. 774; 2000, cc. 66, 657; 2002, cc. 663, 697.

The 1999 amendment

in subsections A, B, and F, substituted “January 10” for “January 1”; in subsections A and B, substituted “of state service” for “of service”; in subsection C, substituted “July 9” for “June 30,” and substituted “July 10 through January 9” for “July 1 through December 31.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendments by cc. 66 and 657 are identical, and substituted “Human Resource Management” for “Personnel and Training” three times.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 663 and 697 are identical, and substituted “elect not” for “do not elect” twice.

§ 51.1-1107.
Family and personal leave benefit.

On the effective date of coverage for existing employees, and thereafter on each January 10, existing participating employees shall receive an amount of family and personal leave based on the number of months of state service as an eligible employee, as follows:

Click to view

Any partial calendar month during which a participating employee was employed shall constitute one month of state service for purposes of this section.

Participating employees, except for those described in subsection A, shall receive an initial amount of family and personal leave at the time their employment or reemployment commences, as follows:

Click to viewThereafter, on each January 10 such employees shall receive an amount of family and personal leave as provided in subsection A.

Participating employees shall not be paid or otherwise compensated upon leaving employment for any balance of unused family and personal leave provided to them under this section.

Unused balances of family and personal leave granted under this section shall not be carried forward beyond the calendar year in which such leave is granted.

Employees receiving disability benefits on January 10 of any year shall be granted family and personal leave for such year on the date they return to active employment. The amount of family and personal leave granted for such year shall be determined as if they were continuing employment on the date of their return to work as provided in subsections A, B and C.

Months of state service
Number of hours
Less than 120
32
120 or more
40

Date employment commenced
Number of hours
January 10 through July 9
32
July 10 through January 9
16

History.

1998, c. 774; 1999, c. 144; 2000, c. 889.

The 1999 amendment

in subsections A, B, and F, substituted “January 10” for January 1”; in subsections A and B, substituted “of state service” for “of service”; in subsection C, substituted “July 9” for “June 30,” and substituted “July 10 through January 9” for “July 1 through December 31.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 889 substituted “coverage for existing employees” for “participation in the program” in subsection A, deleted “prior to January 10, 1999” following “was employed” in subsection B, and in subsection C, substituted “except for those described in subsection A” for “commencing employment or who are reemployed on or after January 1, 1999,” and “at the time their” for “except for those described in subsection A,” and “or reemployment commences” for “based on the date employment commenced,” and inserted “initial” and under “Date employment commenced” substituted “10” for “1” and added the last paragraph.

§ 51.1-1108.
Use of family and personal leave.

Participating employees shall be eligible to take family and personal leave to account for absences due to a short-term incident, illness or death of a family member, or other personal need. Participating employees shall be compensated by their employers at 100 percent of creditable compensation for each hour of family and personal leave taken, not to exceed the employee’s family and personal leave balance.

Family and personal leave may be taken for any permitted purpose at the sole discretion of the participating employee, provided that the employee gives reasonable prior notice to his immediate supervisor and the immediate supervisor does not inform the employee that his taking the leave will materially impede the ability of the employing agency to perform a critical function due to an emergency or exigent circumstances.

History.

1998, c. 774.